Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 3. Orders Drawn by Municipal Bodies

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1621.
Orders for land damages or damages for injuries.

The selectboard may draw orders on the town treasurer for damages for lands or property taken or improved for a highway or other public use, or for damages settled by agreement or awarded for injuries sustained from the insufficiency of a highway.

§ 1622.
Town orders; record.

The chair of the selectboard shall keep or cause to be kept a single record of all orders drawn by the board showing the number, date, to whom payable, for what purpose, and the amount of each order.
(a) (1) The chair of the selectboard shall keep or cause to be kept a single record of all orders drawn by the board showing the number, date, to whom payable, for what purpose, and the amount of each order.

All other officers authorized by law to draw orders upon the town treasurer shall keep or cause to be kept a like record.

Such records shall be submitted to the town auditors annually on or before February 1.

If the records of orders named in this section are made by an assistant clerk, the assistant clerk shall not be the town treasurer or the spouse of the town treasurer or any person acting in the capacity of clerk for the town treasurer.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 1623.
Signing orders.

The selectboard may do either of the following:

Authorize one or more members of the board to examine and allow claims against the town for town expenses and draw orders for such claims to the party entitled to payment.

Orders shall state definitely the purpose for which each is drawn and shall serve as full authority to the treasurer to make the payments.

The selectboard shall be provided with a record of orders drawn under this subdivision (1) whenever orders are signed by less than a majority of the board.

Submit to the town treasurer a certified copy of those portions of the selectboard minutes, properly signed by the clerk and chair or by a majority of the board, showing to whom and for what purpose each payment is to be made by the treasurer. The certified copy of the minutes shall serve as full authority to the treasurer to make the approved payments.

This section shall apply to all municipal public bodies authorized by law to draw orders on the municipal treasurer.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.